Louisiana, session 2026, SB303.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 39:1702(A)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 39:1702(D)
is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1702. Cooperative purchasing authorized; participation in federal General Services
Administration vendor list
A.(1) Any public procurement unit may either participate in, sponsor,
conduct, or administer a cooperative purchasing agreement for the acquisition of any
supplies, services, personal, professional, consulting, and social services, major
repairs, or construction with one or more public procurement units or external
procurement activities or one or more private procurement units in accordance with
an agreement entered into between the participants. Such cooperative purchasing
may include but is not limited to joint or multi-party contracts between public
procurement units and open-ended state public procurement unit contracts which are
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 303 ENROLLED
made available to local public procurement units. Procurement units within the
executive branch of state government which are subject to the authority of the
Office of Technology Services pursuant to R.S. 39:15.1 may also utilize this Part
for the procurement of information technology systems and information
technology services as provided in Part V-A of Chapter 1 of Subtitle I of this
Title. Nothing in this Part shall be construed to expand or limit the authority
of the Office of Technology Services as established in R.S. 39:15.1 through 15.3.
Such cooperative purchasing may include but is not limited to:
(a) Joint or multi-party contracts between public procurement units.
(b) Open-ended state public procurement unit contracts which are made
available to public procurement units.
(c) Contracts between a public procurement unit and an external
procurement activity under which the public procurement unit accesses and
utilizes an existing information technology system belonging to the external
procurement activity in exchange for payment of a share of the costs associated
with the system. The public procurement unit shall not be required to
participate in a competitive procurement process for such contracts, provided
that the external procurement activity originally acquired the system by means
of a contract procured through a competitive procurement process.
* * *
D. Procurement units within the executive branch of government which
are subject to the authority of the Office of Technology Services pursuant to
R.S. 39:15.1 may procure information technology systems and services as
provided in Part V-A of Chapter 1 of Subtitle I of this Title from the General
Services Administration supply schedules. Such purchases need not comply
with the competitive bidding requirements of this Chapter.
Section 2. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Interstate Technology
Collaboration Act".
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 303 ENROLLED
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.